Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.10
Licensed visual lead-hazard advisor, defined.

Licensed visual lead-hazard advisor means an individual who has been trained by an accredited training program and licensed by the department to conduct a visual lead-hazard screen.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 12;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1270.